incubator/apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
    <pardef n="radi/us__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ane</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>usen</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oks/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lene</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ler</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/ong__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>engene</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enger</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onga</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ongi</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ong</l>
          <r>ong<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ot/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rane</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="norrønt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rettbr/or__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oren</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ørne</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ør</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>or</l>
          <r>or<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rast/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erane</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erar</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eren</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sing/el__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ela</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elen</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>elet</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eli</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>el</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lane</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lar</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>let</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>el<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ski__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ene</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="oksel"><i>oks</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skulemeister"><i>skulemeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rong"><i>r</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="singel"><i>sing</i><par n="sing/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="radius"><i>radi</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="røyrtong"><i>røyrt</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smietong"><i>smiet</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prydvokster"><i>prydvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="senter"><i>sent</i><par n="rast/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="overgangsalder"><i>overgangsald</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ski"><i>ski</i><par n="ski__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sider"><i>sid</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nykleblomster"><i>nykleblomst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salamander"><i>salamand</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ringfinger"><i>ringfing</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="salpetergjødsel"><i>salpetergjøds</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polyesterfiber"><i>polyesterfib</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sauegjødsel"><i>sauegjøds</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skogvokster"><i>skogvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pediater"><i>pediat</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samferdselsminister"><i>samferdselsminist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="premierminister"><i>premierminist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="polarvinter"><i>polarvint</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skipsferdsel"><i>skipsferds</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samvokster"><i>samvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rodemeister"><i>rodemeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slyngelalder"><i>slyngelald</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="norrønt"><i>norrønt</i><par n="norrønt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skattmeister"><i>skattmeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samferdsleminister"><i>samferdsleminist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordensbror"><i>ordensbr</i><par n="rettbr/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="romalder"><i>romald</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slengalder"><i>slengald</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="siger"><i>sig</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rettbror"><i>rettbr</i><par n="rettbr/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pilaster"><i>pilast</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skjeggvokster"><i>skjeggvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sirkelradius"><i>sirkelradi</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rotvokster"><i>rotvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panikkalder"><i>panikkald</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slukstong"><i>slukst</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjøblomster"><i>sjøblomst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smørsel"><i>smørs</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasjonsblomster"><i>pasjonsblomst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rekster"><i>rekst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="postpakkmeister"><i>postpakkmeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skoghogster"><i>skoghogst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skivestong"><i>skivest</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rittmeister"><i>rittmeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slagsbror"><i>slagsbr</i><par n="rettbr/or__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sagmeister"><i>sagmeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primarius"><i>primari</i><par n="radi/us__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pløgsel"><i>pløgs</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seriemeister"><i>seriemeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slåter"><i>slåt</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rørtong"><i>rørt</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samfunnsvokster"><i>samfunnsvokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrangel"><i>skrang</i><par n="sing/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyrrhossiger"><i>pyrrhossig</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="raster"><i>rast</i><par n="rast/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nyttevokster"><i>nyttevokst</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sjøferdsel"><i>sjøferds</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="politimeister"><i>politimeist</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinober"><i>sinob</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samferdsel"><i>samferds</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potetåker"><i>potetåk</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skirsel"><i>skirs</i><par n="oks/el__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sittestong"><i>sittest</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oker"><i>ok</i><par n="ot/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sitjestong"><i>sitjest</i><par n="r/ong__n"/></e>
